incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON PROP_ǬʼJ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼj:ǭj 124
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 125
LEXICON PROP_IRM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KIM	    ;

LEXICON PROP_KIM-SG !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KIM-SG	    ;

!!= @CODE@ : 127
LEXICON PROP_VȮŅ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VAʼIT !!= @CODE@ vaʼit:vait 128
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AMĀT !!= @CODE@ : 129
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KULTŪR !!= @CODE@ : 130
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
LEXICON PROP_SAʼGDIT
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VIĻȚ !!= @CODE@ : 132
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ : 133
LEXICON PROP_EĻ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134
LEXICON PROP_BLĒʼḐ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_FAKT !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_FAKT	;

LEXICON PROP_FAKT-SG !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_FAKT-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_TAS !!= @CODE@ tas:tas 136
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 137
LEXICON PROP_NEITST
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 138
LEXICON PROP_SĪEND
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
LEXICON PROP_LǞND
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ : 140
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ANALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 141
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_NĪʼEM	;

LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM-SG !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_NĪʼEM-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_JAĻKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 143
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 144
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_RŪʼTŠ !!= @CODE@ rūʼtš:rūʼtš 145
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

!!= @CODE@ tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
LEXICON PROP_TĒʼḐ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼḐ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 148
LEXICON PROP_KĪNTŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 149
LEXICON PROP_KǬŅTŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 150
LEXICON PROP_LĒŅTŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 151
LEXICON PROP_LĪEM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ aʼm:am 152
LEXICON PROP_AʼM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AZŪM !!= @CODE@ : 153
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VÕȚĪM !!= @CODE@ : 154
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ : 155
LEXICON PROP_KǬŅIM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 156
LEXICON PROP_ĒTAM
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SIDĀM !!= @CODE@ : 157
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG !!= @CODE@ : 158
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TŪOITÕG	;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG !!= @CODE@ : 158
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TŪOITÕG-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND !!= @CODE@ : 159
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KǬRAND	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND-SG !!= @CODE@ : 159
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_ȬʼDÕG !!= @CODE@ ȭʼdõg:ȭʼdõg 160
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;
!!= @CODE@ : 161
LEXICON PROP_TAPTÕD
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
LEXICON PROP_TĪEDÕD
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 163
LEXICON PROP_VĪDÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 164
LEXICON PROP_TUOISTÕNZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
LEXICON PROP_ĪDÕKSMÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 166
LEXICON PROP_MĪEZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 167
LEXICON PROP_ROʼVZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 168
LEXICON PROP_KÄBRĀZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_MAIGĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 169
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NÕTKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 170
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_RIKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 171
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_BIKŠĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 172
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀMBAZ !!= @CODE@ : 173
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪŖAZ !!= @CODE@ : 174
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 175
LEXICON PROP_PǬĻAZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_RĒNAZ !!= @CODE@ : 176
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TŌVAZ !!= @CODE@ : 177
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 178
LEXICON PROP_PŪORAZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 179
LEXICON PROP_MÕTKÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 180
LEXICON PROP_VȬRÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ARĀGÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 181
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ÄʼGGÕZ !!= @CODE@ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
LEXICON PROP_PŪʼDÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VĪETŠÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 184
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
LEXICON PROP_LǬʼTŠÕZ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 186
LEXICON PROP_SĒJI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 187
LEXICON PROP_AKKIJI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼji:lēji 188
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼJI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 189
LEXICON PROP_TUĻĻI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
LEXICON PROP_LÄʼBḐI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 191
LEXICON PROP_NAI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_AʼIGI !!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;



!!= @CODE@ puʼnni:punni 193
LEXICON PROP_PUʼNNI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 194
LEXICON PROP_KAȚKI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 195
LEXICON PROP_KUKKI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ aigi:aigi 196
LEXICON PROP_AIGI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 197
LEXICON PROP_OUKI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 198
LEXICON PROP_PAŖĪ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 199
LEXICON PROP_TŪĻI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ aʼbli:abli 200
LEXICON PROP_AʼBLI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 201
LEXICON PROP_SĒMI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼmi:lēmi 202
LEXICON PROP_LĒʼMI
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 203
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_NȬŖKÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 204
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KATŪKS !!= @CODE@ : 205
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĀNDÕKS !!= @CODE@ : 206
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 207
LEXICON PROP_KĒRATÕKS
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
LEXICON PROP_ÄʼBȚÕKS
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 209
LEXICON PROP_VARĪKŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 210
LEXICON PROP_UKŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;
!!= @CODE@ : 211
LEXICON PROP_LÄPŠ
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TUʼĻ !!= @CODE@ : 213
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TŪĻ !!= @CODE@ : 214
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KĒĻ !!= @CODE@ : 215
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KAKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 218
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SĒŅ !!= @CODE@ : 220
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_JŪŖ !!= @CODE@ : 221
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SŪR !!= @CODE@ : 222
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SĒR !!= @CODE@ : 223
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_BIRKOV !!= @CODE@ : 224
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ !!= @CODE@ : 225
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_SALĀJ	;

LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ-SG !!= @CODE@ : 225
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_SALĀJ-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_UMĀRZ !!= @CODE@ umārz:umār 226
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ   ;

LEXICON PROP_DULLÕNZ !!= @CODE@ dullõnz:dullõn 227
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_AʼBBÕNZ !!= @CODE@ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_AŅGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_KAʼGGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_PǞGIŅŽ !!= @CODE@ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_UMĀRZ	;

LEXICON PROP_VAGĀŖ !!= @CODE@ vagāŗ:vagāŗ 232
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TIDĀR	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-SG !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TIDĀR-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-PL !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
%<n%>%<prop%>:	NMN_TIDĀR-PL	;

LEXICON PROP_PĒGAL !!= @CODE@ pēgal:pēgal 234
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ǬʼRÕN !!= @CODE@ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_KĪNDÕR !!= @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_BÄʼZMÕR !!= @CODE@ bäʼzmõr:bäzmõr 238
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_TARĪĻ !!= @CODE@ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON propernouns
Aʼbrig:Aʼbrig PROP_ȬʼDÕG   ; !""
Āfrik:Āfrik PROP_AMĀT   ; !""
Amērik:Amērik PROP_AMĀT   ; !""
Aņtš:Aņtš PROP_JAĻKŠ   ; !""
Berlīn:Berlīn PROP_KULTŪR   ; !""
Brissõl:Brissõl PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Dūmõl:Dūmõl PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Dūobõl:Dūobõl PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Dūoņig:Dūoņig PROP_KǬRAND   ; !""
Ēgipt:Ēgipt PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Eirop:Eirop PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Gipk:Gipk PROP_FAKT   ; !""
Hapsal:Hapsal PROP_PĒGAL   ; !""
Holand:Holand PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Irāj:Irāj PROP_SALĀJ-SG   ; !""
Island:Island PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Iʼzrael:Iʼzrael PROP_VAʼIT   ; !""
Jālgab:Jālgab PROP_ĒTAM   ; !""
Japān:Japān PROP_TIDĀR   ; !""
Kanād:Kanād PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Kāndab:Kāndab PROP_ĒTAM   ; !""
Kõuvšt% nīt:Kõuvšt% nīt PROP_IRM   ; !""
Kuldīg:Kuldīg PROP_SIDĀM   ; !""
Kuoštrõg:Kuoštrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG   ; !""
Kuresār:Kuresār PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Laʼdgal:Laʼdgal PROP_AMĀT   ; !""
Limbaž:Limbaž PROP_JAĻKŠ   ; !""
London:London PROP_PĒGAL   ; !""
Luksemburg:Luksemburg PROP_VȮŅ   ; !""
Lūʼž:Lūʼž PROP_RŪʼTŠ   ; !""
Moldov:Moldov PROP_BIRKOV   ; !""
Moskov:Moskov PROP_BIRKOV   ; !""
Mustānum:Mustā#num PROP_KIM-SG   ; !""
Nabāld:Nabāl PROP_TIDĀR-PL   ; !""
Ōst:Ōst PROP_FAKT-SG   ; !""
Parīz:Parīz PROP_ĀIGAST   ; !""
Patskul:Patskul PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Pǟrnov:Pǟrnov PROP_BIRKOV   ; !""
Pētõrgrād:Pētõrgrād PROP_IRM   ; !""
Piltõn:Piltõn PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Pitrõg:Pitrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG   ; !""
Portugal:Portugal PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Pūoip:Pūoip PROP_IRM   ; !""
Rōm:Rōm PROP_IRM   ; !""
Sabīl:Sabīl PROP_KULTŪR   ; !""
Salāts:Salāts PROP_ĀIGAST   ; !""
Sǟnag:Sǟnag PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG   ; !""
Sǟr:Sǟr PROP_SŪR   ; !""
Sīkrõg:Sīkrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG   ; !""
Spāņ:Spāņ PROP_VIĻȚ   ; !""
Sūrsūo:Sūr#sūo PROP_SŪR   ; !""
Šlītõr:Šlītõr PROP_KĪNDÕR   ; !""
Šveits:Šveits PROP_FAKT   ; !""
Tallin:Tallin PROP_ĀIGAST   ; !""
Tsälmõt:Tsälmõt PROP_AMĀT   ; !""
Tsirst:Tsirst PROP_FAKT   ; !""
Ugāl:Ugāl PROP_TIDĀR   ; !""
Ukrain:Ukrain PROP_IRM   ; !""
Ungar:Ungar PROP_TIDĀR   ; !""
Vaʼid:Vaʼid PROP_NĪʼEM-SG   ; !""
Vīḑõl:Vīḑõl PROP_APPÕN   ; !""
Viļņ:Viļņ PROP_VIĻȚ   ; !""
Zemgal:Zemgal PROP_AMĀT   ; !""
